District of Columbia statutes.
47-2885.14

Labeling of prescriptions.

All drugs shall be dispensed in a suitable container appropriately labeled for subsequent administration to or use by an individual entitled to the drug. Any drug dispensed, except to inpatients of a licensed hospital, shall include on the label of the container the name of the drug and the strength of the drug when applicable, unless otherwise directed by the prescribing practitioner, and the name, address and telephone number of the pharmacy filling the prescription, the prescription number, the date of issuance and the name of the prescriber, directions for use, the name of the individual for whom the prescription is written, and other information and labeling which may be required by any District of Columbia or federal laws or regulations.

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-98, § 15, 27 DCR 3528
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
1981 Ed., § 2-2014.
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.